sl-SI: Vrsta pripomočka za premestitev: Zračna prenosna blazina; Upogljiva prenosna deska; Toga prenosna deska; Drsna rjuha; Prenosna rjuha; Drugo
ru: Тип приспособления для перемещения: Воздушный мат для перемещения; Гибкая доска для перемещения; Жесткая доска для перемещения; Скользящая простыня; Простыня для перемещения; Другой
nl: Type transferhulpmiddel: Luchtondersteunde transfermat; Flexibele transferplank; Stijve transferplank; Glijlaken; Transferlaken; Andere
lt-LT: Persėdimo priemonės tipas: Oro pagalba perkeliamasis kilimėlis; Lanksti perkėlimo lenta; Kieta perkėlimo lenta; Slydimo paklodė; Perkėlimo paklodė; Kita
vi: Loại dụng cụ hỗ trợ di chuyển: Thảm chuyển hỗ trợ khí; Bảng chuyển linh hoạt; Bảng chuyển cứng; Tấm trượt; Tấm chuyển; Khác
en: Transfer aid type: Air-assisted transfer mat; Flexible transfer board; Rigid transfer board; Slide sheet; Transfer sheet; Other
tr: Transfer yardımcısı türü: Hava destekli transfer matı; Esnek transfer tahtası; Sert transfer tahtası; Kayma çarşafı; Transfer çarşafı; Diğer
zh-CN: 转移辅助类型: 气动辅助转移垫; 柔性转移板; 刚性转移板; 滑动床单; 转移床单; 其他
zh-TW: 轉移輔助器類型: 氣壓輔助移位墊; 彈性移位板; 硬式移位板; 滑移單; 移位單; 其他
ko: 이동 보조기구 유형: 공기 보조 이동 매트; 유연한 이동 보드; 견고한 이동 보드; 슬라이드 시트; 이동 시트; 기타
de: Transferhilfsmittelart: Luftunterstützte Transfermatte; Flexibles Transferbrett; Starres Transferbrett; Gleittuch; Transfertuch; Sonstiges
sv: Överföringshjälpmedelstyp: Luftassisterad överföringsmatta; Flexibel överföringsbräda; Styv överföringsbräda; Glidlakan; Överföringslakan; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de ajutor pentru transfer: Saltea de transfer asistată cu aer; Placă de transfer flexibilă; Placă de transfer rigidă; Cearșaf de alunecare; Cearșaf de transfer; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de auxílio de transferência: Tapete de transferência assistido por ar; Tábua de transferência flexível; Tábua de transferência rígida; Lençol deslizante; Lençol de transferência; Outro
hu: Áthelyező segédeszköz típusa: Levegő segítségű áthelyező szőnyeg; Hajlékony áthelyező tábla; Merev áthelyező tábla; Csúszólap; Áthelyező lap; Egyéb
it: Tipo di ausilio per il trasferimento: Tappetino di trasferimento ad aria; Tavola di trasferimento flessibile; Tavola di trasferimento rigida; Telo di scorrimento; Telo di trasferimento; Altro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ช่วยเคลื่อนย้าย: เบาะเคลื่อนย้ายด้วยลม; แผ่นเคลื่อนย้ายแบบยืดหยุ่น; แผ่นเคลื่อนย้ายแบบแข็ง; แผ่นสไลด์; แผ่นเคลื่อนย้าย; อื่นๆ
nb: Overføringshjelpemiddeltype: Luftassistert overføringsmatte; Fleksibelt overføringsbrett; Stivt overføringsbrett; Glidelaken; Overføringslaken; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de auxílio de transferência: Tapete de transferência assistido por ar; Prancha de transferência flexível; Prancha de transferência rígida; Lençol deslizante; Lençol de transferência; Outro
es: Tipo de ayuda para transferencia: Colchoneta de transferencia asistida por aire; Tabla de transferencia flexible; Tabla de transferencia rígida; Sábana deslizante; Sábana de transferencia; Otros
el: Τύπος βοηθήματος μεταφοράς: Στρώμα μεταφοράς με αέρα; Εύκαμπτη σανίδα μεταφοράς; Άκαμπτη σανίδα μεταφοράς; Φύλλο ολίσθησης; Φύλλο μεταφοράς; Άλλο
pl: Typ pomocy transferowej: Mata transferowa wspomagana powietrzem; Elastyczna deska transferowa; Sztywna deska transferowa; Arkusz ślizgowy; Arkusz transferowy; Inne
fr: Type d’aide au transfert: Matelas de transfert assisté par air; Planche de transfert flexible; Planche de transfert rigide; Drap de glissement; Drap de transfert; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta pomagala za prijenos: Zračna prostirka za transfer; Fleksibilna daska za transfer; Kruta daska za transfer; Klizna plahta; Plahta za transfer; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ pomôcky na presun osôb: Vzduchom podporovaná presúvacia podložka; Flexibilná presúvacia doska; Pevná presúvacia doska; Klzná plachta; Presúvacia plachta; Iné
da: Overførselshjælpemiddeltype: Luftassisteret overføringsmåtte; Fleksibelt overføringsbræt; Stift overføringsbræt; Glidelagen; Overføringslagen; Andet
cs: Typ přesunové pomůcky: Přenosová podložka s vzduchovým asistentem; Flexibilní přenosové prkno; Tuhé přenosové prkno; Kluzná plachta; Přenosová plachta; Jiné
ja: 移乗補助具タイプ: エアアシスト移乗マット; フレキシブル移乗ボード; リジッド移乗ボード; スライドシート; 移乗シート; その他
fi: Siirtymisen apuvälineen tyyppi: Ilmalla avustettu siirtomatto; Joustava siirtolauta; Jäykkä siirtolauta; Liukulakana; Siirtolakana; Muu
bg-BG: Тип помощно средство за трансфер: Въздушно подпомагана постелка за трансфер; Гъвкава дъска за трансфер; Твърда дъска за трансфер; Плъзгащ чаршаф; Чаршаф за трансфер; Други